Rhode Island statutes. Title 17 Elections
Chapter 19 Conduct of Election and Voting Equipment, and Supplies
17-19-32.
Recording and signing of returns.

Immediately upon the close of the polls the warden shall, in the presence of the other election or primary election officers and the election inspector, follow the procedure for the closing of the unit set forth by the vendor of the optical scan precinct count unit. The warden and clerk shall sign the first copy of the tape containing the votes cast and shall remove the tape from the optical scan precinct count unit. The warden shall then obtain three (3) additional copies of the tape containing the vote totals from the optical scan precinct count unit, and the warden shall proceed to read off in a clear and loud voice the vote for each candidate, and upon each question as indicated by the vote totals on the printed tape and the number of votes cast for persons not nominated.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2195, § 18; P.L. 1938, ch. 2640, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 318, § 14; P.L. 1940, ch. 818, § 1; P.L. 1944, ch. 1525, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, §§ 36, 39; G.L. 1956, §

17-19-28

; G.L. 1956, §

17-19-32

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 277, § 12; P.L. 1996, ch. 298, § 12; P.L. 2006, ch. 192, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 313, § 1.

17-19-33.
Sealing of voting equipment — Sealing and forwarding of results, programmed memory devices and keys.

The copies of the printout tape from the optical-scan precinct-count unit obtained pursuant to §

17-19-32

shall be distributed as follows:

The first copy, which includes the opening of the polling place information, signatures of the warden and clerk, a timed audit trail of certain events occurring with respect to the optical-scan precinct-count system, and the vote totals for each candidate, shall be attached to the return sheet as provided in §

17-19-11

and immediately delivered to the local board of canvassers where it is processed and delivered to the state board of elections through a procedure promulgated by the state board;

A copy shall be made available to the public at the polling place;

A copy shall be immediately delivered to the local board of canvassers attached to the return sheet as provided in §

17-19-11

, together with the polling place supplies, including the key to the optical-scan precinct-count unit and other voting equipment and containers; and

A copy shall be included with the voted ballots and packaged pursuant to this chapter.

The certified paper or electronic voter list containing voters’ signatures shall be secured separately and returned to the local board of canvassers.

All completed official affidavits, forms, reports, and supplies shall be packaged and delivered to the local board for subsequent delivery to the state board.

The warden shall:

Remove all voted ballots from the compartment of the optical-scan precinct-count unit and package them in the container provided and labeled as voted ballots and stored pursuant to §

17-19-39.1

;

[Deleted by P.L. 2016, ch. 174, § 1 and P.L. 2016, ch. 190, § 1.]

Package all ballots from the emergency bin that have not been counted in the container provided and labeled as manual-count ballots and deliver to the local canvassing authority. Any ballots packaged and labeled as manual-count ballots shall remain sealed and delivered to the state board through a procedure promulgated by the state board.

All ballots so packaged shall be immediately delivered to the local canvassing authority.

[Deleted by P.L. 2016, ch. 174, § 1 and P.L. 2016, ch. 190, § 1.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2195, § 18; P.L. 1938, ch. 2640, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 318, § 14; P.L. 1940, ch. 818, § 1; P.L. 1944, ch. 1525, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-19-29

; G.L. 1956, §

17-19-33

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 277, § 12; P.L. 1996, ch. 298, § 12; P.L. 2004, ch. 128, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 494, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 192, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 313, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 174, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 190, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 451, § 9.

17-19-34.
Declaration of results and certificates of election in towns not divided into districts.

When optical scan precinct count units are used in town elections in towns not divided into voting districts, the warden, after announcing the votes registered by the optical scan precinct count units for the candidates for town offices, and upon questions submitted to the voters of the town, and signing the record of the votes in the record book, shall declare the result of the town election, and certificates shall be issued to the officers declared elected.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2195, § 18; P.L. 1938, ch. 2640, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 318, § 14; P.L. 1940, ch. 818, § 1; P.L. 1944, ch. 1525, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-19-30

; G.L. 1956, §

17-19-34

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 277, § 12; P.L. 1996, ch. 298, § 12.

17-19-35.
Guarding optical scan precinct count units until resumption of custody by board.

Under orders of the local board, a police officer shall remain at the voting place until the board, personally or by a custodian, resumes custody of the optical scan precinct count units and voting booths.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 318, § 14; P.L. 1944, ch. 1525, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-19-31

; G.L. 1956, §

17-19-35

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 277, § 12; P.L. 1996, ch. 298, § 12.

17-19-36.
Tabulation of town returns — Certificate of election.

The local board shall meet on the day following the election and shall tabulate the town or city election returns, as the case may be, and announce the results, but shall issue no certificates of election until the time for petitions filed under this section has expired and, if a petition has been filed, until the petition has been finally determined. Any candidate at the election challenging the correctness of the declaration of result as applied to the candidate may, within seven (7) days after the election, petition the state board to conduct a recount of the votes cast according to the provisions set forth in §

17-19-37.1

. After the completion of the recount, and if it finds that the candidate was elected, it shall direct the local board to issue to the candidate a certificate of election, but if it finds that the candidate declared to be elected by the local board was in fact elected, it shall direct the board to issue a certificate of election to the candidate previously declared elected.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 318, § 14; P.L. 1940, ch. 818, § 1; P.L. 1944, ch. 1525, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-19-32

; G.L. 1956, §

17-19-36

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1968, ch. 248, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 277, § 12; P.L. 1996, ch. 298, § 12.

17-19-37.
Tabulation of state returns — Certificate of election.

The state board shall proceed to tabulate the state election returns and declare the results as provided in chapter 22 of this title, and any candidate at the election challenging the result as applied to him or her may petition the board within seven (7) days after the declaration to conduct a recount of the votes cast in the candidate’s election according to the provisions set forth in §

17-19-37.1

. After the completion of the recount, and as soon as it can do so consistent with its other duties, the state board shall issue a certificate of election to the state and federal candidate it determines to have been elected.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 318, § 14; P.L. 1940, ch. 818, § 1; P.L. 1944, ch. 1525, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-19-33

; G.L. 1956, §

17-19-37

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 277, § 12; P.L. 1996, ch. 298, § 12.

17-19-37.1.
Recount eligibility — Candidates for public office.

A candidate for election or nomination for election to public office shall be eligible to request a recount of the votes cast in his or her race pursuant to the following:

In those races in which a single candidate is elected a candidate who trails the winning candidate may request a recount of the votes cast at each precinct by a manual re-feeding of the computer ballots cast in said race into the optical scan voting equipment provided that the candidate shall trail the winning candidate by less than the following number of votes:

In those races where the number of votes cast is less than or equal to twenty thousand (20,000) the candidate requesting the recount shall trail the winning candidate by two percent (2%) or two hundred (200) votes, whichever is less; in those races where the number of votes cast is between twenty thousand one (20,001) and one hundred thousand (100,000) the candidate requesting the recount shall trail the winning candidate by one percent (1%) or five hundred (500) votes, whichever is less; and, in those races where more than one hundred thousand (100,000) votes are cast the candidate requesting the recount shall trail the winning candidate by one-half of one percent (1/2%) or one thousand five hundred (1,500) votes, whichever is less.

For the purpose of determining recount eligibility, as prescribed in subsections (1)(a) and (3) of this section, the number of votes cast in a race shall include the votes cast for candidates and irregular ballots cast pursuant to §

17-19-31

.

In those races in which more than one candidate is elected a candidate who trails the winning candidate may request a recount of the votes cast at each precinct by a manual re-feeding of the computer ballots cast in said race into the optical scan voting equipment provided that the candidate shall trail the winning candidate by less than the following number of votes:

In those races where the number of votes cast is less than or equal to five thousand (5,000) the candidate requesting the recount shall trail the winning candidate by two percent (2%) or fifty (50) votes, whichever is less; in those races where the number of votes cast is between five thousand one (5,001) and twenty thousand (20,000) the candidate requesting the recount shall trail the winning candidate by one percent (1%) or one hundred (100) votes, whichever is less; and in those races where more than twenty thousand (20,000) votes are cast the candidate requesting the recount shall trail the winning candidate by one-half of one percent (1/2%) or one hundred fifty (150) votes, whichever is less.

For the purpose of determining recount eligibility, as prescribed in subsections (2)(a) and (3) of this section, the total number of votes cast in a race shall be determined by dividing the total number of votes eligible to be cast in the race by the number of candidates for whom each voter was eligible to cast votes.

Notwithstanding the requirements of subsections (1)(a) and (2)(a) of this section, a candidate who trails the winning candidate by five percent (5%) or less, but more than the minimum percentage or number of votes as required in subsections (1)(a) or (2)(a) of this section, as applicable, may petition the state board to conduct a recount of the votes cast at each precinct by re-reading the programmed memory device or devices and comparing the results and totals obtained at such recount with the results and totals obtained on election night. If, after said recount, a candidate shall trail the winning candidate by less than the number of votes prescribed in subsection (1)(a) or (2)(a) of this section, as the case may be, the candidate may request a recount of the votes cast at each precinct to subsection (1)(a) or (2)(a) of this section, as is applicable.

The state board shall have the authority to adopt rules and regulations to implement and administer the provisions of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 277, § 2; P.L. 1996, ch. 298, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 264, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 483, § 1.

17-19-37.2.
Recount eligibility — Write-in candidates for public office.

A write-in candidate for election to public office shall be eligible to request a recount of the votes cast in a race:

If, following the initial manual count of all irregular ballots, the write-in candidate shall have received a minimum of ten (10) votes or one percent (1%) of the votes cast in the race, whichever is greater; provided, however, that if no candidates appear on the ballot in said race and only write-in candidates receive votes, a write-in candidate shall be required to receive at least ten (10) votes in the race; and

The write-in candidate shall trail the winning candidate by less than the number of votes as may be required to qualify for a recount pursuant to subsection (1) or (2) of §

17-19-37.1

, as is applicable.

A write-in candidate for public office who is eligible to request a recount pursuant to subsection (1) of this section may request a recount of the irregular ballots cast at each precinct by a manual recounting of said ballots. In addition, the state board may, upon its own motion, determine to manually re-feed the computer ballots cast at each precinct in the race into the optical scan voting equipment.

The state board shall have the authority to adopt rules and regulations to implement and administer the provisions of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 264, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 483, § 2.

17-19-37.3.
Recount eligibility — Ballot questions and other offices.

A person, group or organization of “recognized standing” regarding a ballot question, as determined by the board of elections, may request a recount of the votes cast on the ballot question pursuant to the following:

The person, group or organization may request a recount of the votes cast at each precinct by re-reading the programmed memory device or devices and comparing the results and totals obtained at such recount with the results and totals obtained on election night, provided that for those ballot questions where less than one hundred thousand (100,000) votes are cast the difference between the approval or rejection of the question shall be by two percent (2%) or less; and, for those ballot questions where one hundred thousand (100,000) or more votes are cast the difference between the approval or rejection of the question shall be by one percent (1%) or less. If, after said recount, the difference between the approval or rejection of the ballot question shall be less than one-half of one percent (1/2%) or five hundred (500) votes, whichever is less, the petitioner may request a recount pursuant to subsection (1)(b) of this section.

The person, group or organization may request a recount of the votes cast at each precinct by a manual re-feeding of the computer ballots are cast into the optical scan voting equipment if the difference between the approval and rejection of the ballot question shall be by less than one-half of one percent (1/2%) or five hundred (500) votes, whichever is less.

For the purpose of determining recount eligibility for ballot questions, as prescribed in subsections (1)(a) and (b) of this section, only the total number of votes cast as “approve” and “reject” for said question shall be included.

A candidate for any office other than a public office shall be eligible to request a recount of the votes cast in his or her race pursuant to the following:

In those races in which a single candidate is elected a candidate who trails the winning candidate by less than two percent (2%) or one hundred (100) votes, whichever is less, may request a recount of the votes cast at each precinct by re-reading the programmed memory device or devices and comparing the results and totals obtained at such recount with the results and totals obtained on election night.

For the purpose of determining recount eligibility, as prescribed in subsection (2)(a)(i) of this section, the number of votes cast in a race shall include the votes cast for candidates and irregular ballots cast pursuant to §

17-19-31

.

In those races in which more than one but less than eight (8) candidates are elected a candidate who trails the winning candidate by less than one percent (1%) or twenty-five (25) votes, whichever is less, may request a recount of the votes cast at each precinct by re-reading the programmed memory device or devices and comparing the results and totals obtained at such recount with the results and totals obtained on election night.

In those races in which more eight (8) or more candidates are elected a candidate who trails the winning candidate by less than one-half of one percent (1/2%) or twenty-five (25) votes, whichever is less, may request a recount of the votes cast at each precinct by re-reading the programmed memory device or devices and comparing the results and totals obtained at such recount with the results and totals obtained on election night.

For the purpose of determining recount eligibility, as prescribed in subsections (2)(b) and (c) of this section, the total number of votes cast in a race shall be determined by dividing the total number of votes eligible to be cast in the race by the number of candidates for whom each voter was eligible to cast votes.

The state board shall have the authority to adopt rules and regulations to implement and administer the provisions of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 264, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 483, § 2.

17-19-37.4.
Post-election audits.

The general assembly hereby finds, determines, and declares that auditing of election results is necessary to ensure effective election administration and public confidence in the election results. Further, risk-limiting audits provide a more effective manner of conducting audits than traditional audit methods in that risk-limiting audit methods typically require only limited resources for election contests with wide margins of victory while investing greater resources in close contests.

Commencing in 2018, the board, in conjunction with local boards, is authorized to conduct risk-limiting audits after all statewide primary, general, and special elections in accordance with the requirements of this section. Commencing in 2020, the state board, in conjunction with local boards, must conduct risk-limiting audits after the presidential preference primary and general elections in accordance with the requirements in this section.

The audit program shall be conducted as follows:

The state board shall determine what local, statewide, and federal contests are subject to a risk-limiting audit;

The state board shall provide notice pursuant to chapter 46 of title 42 of the time and place of the random selection of the audit units to be manually tallied and of the times and places of the audits;

The state board shall make available to the public a report of the vote-tabulating device results for the contest, including the results for each audit unit in the contest, prior to the random selection of audit units to be manually tallied and prior to the commencement of the audit;

The state board, in conjunction with the local boards, shall conduct the audit upon tabulation of the unofficial final results as provided in §§

17-19-36

and

17-19-37

; and

The state board, in conjunction with the local boards, shall conduct the audit in public view by manually interpreting the ballots according to rules established by the state board in accordance with chapter 35 of title 42.

If a risk-limiting audit of a contest leads to a full manual tally of the ballots cast using the voting system, the vote counts according to that manual tally shall replace the vote counts reported pursuant to §§

17-19-36

and

17-19-37

for the purpose of determining the official contest results pursuant to §§

17-22-5.2

and

17-22-6

.

For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

“Audit unit” means a precinct, a set of ballots, or a single ballot. A precinct, a set of ballots, or a single ballot may be used as an audit unit for purposes of this section only if all of the following conditions are satisfied:

The relevant vote-tabulating device is able to produce a report of the votes cast in the precinct, set of ballots, or single ballot; and

Each ballot is assigned to not more than one audit unit.

“Contest” means an election for an office or for a measure.

“Risk-limiting audit” means a manual tally employing a statistical method that ensures a large, predetermined minimum chance of requiring a full manual tally whenever a full manual tally would show an electoral outcome that differs from the outcome reported by the vote-tabulating system for the audited contest. A risk-limiting audit shall begin with a hand tally of the votes in one or more audit units and shall continue to hand tally votes in additional audit units until there is strong statistical evidence that the electoral outcome is correct. In the event that counting additional audit units does not provide strong statistical evidence that the electoral outcome is correct, the audit shall continue until there has been a full manual tally to determine the correct electoral outcome of the audited contest.

“Unofficial final results” means election results tabulated pursuant to §§

17-19-36

and

17-19-37

.

The results of any audits conducted under this section shall be published on the website of the state board within forty-eight (48) hours of being accepted by the state board. If the audit involved a manual tally of one or more entire precincts, then the names and numbers of all precincts audited and a comparison of the vote tabulator results with the hand counts for each precinct shall be published with the audit results on the website.

Any audit required under this section shall not commence for any election subject to a recount pursuant to §§

17-19-37.1

,

17-19-37.2

, and

17-19-37.3

until the conclusion of said recount.

The state board shall promulgate rules, regulations, and procedures in accordance with chapter 35 of title 42 necessary to implement this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 2017, ch. 410, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 423, § 1.

17-19-38.
Custody of optical scan precinct count units pending return to storage.

After the close of the polls, the local board shall resume custody of the voting equipment until the voting equipment is removed by the state board or its designee. The local board shall take all necessary measures to prevent the voting equipment from being opened, tampered with, injured, or damaged.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2195, § 19; G.L. 1938, ch. 318, § 15; P.L. 1940, ch. 818, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, §§ 36, 39; G.L. 1956, §

17-19-35

; G.L. 1956, §

17-19-38

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 277, § 12; P.L. 1996, ch. 298, § 12; P.L. 2006, ch. 192, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 313, § 1.

17-19-39.
Power to open voting equipment.

The state board of elections shall have the right to open any and all voting equipment either before, during or after an election in the presence of the proper election officials of the city or town in which the election is held for the purpose of examining the voting equipment; provided, that no programmed memory cartridge shall be erased until after the expiration of ten (10) days from the election at which the voting equipment was used, unless said memory cartridge is required by the state board for the purpose of conducting recounts.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2195, § 19; G.L. 1938, ch. 318, § 15; P.L. 1940, ch. 818, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, §§ 36, 39; G.L. 1956, §

17-19-36

; G.L. 1956, §

17-19-39

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 211, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 277, § 12; P.L. 1996, ch. 298, § 12; P.L. 2004, ch. 128, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 494, § 1.

17-19-39.1.
Voted ballot storage and security.

Voted computer ballots that were counted at the state board shall be stored in containers by the state board until the expiration of twenty-two (22) months from the date of election and voted computer ballots that were voted and packaged at a local precinct or counted at the local board shall be held and stored in containers by the local board in accordance with the regulations promulgated by the state board until the expiration of twenty-two (22) months from the date of election. The voted ballots shall remain stored in the appropriate containers unless ordered to be opened by the state board or a court of law. The computer file containing ballot layout information and candidate totals shall be transferred to a disk and retained permanently.

Notwithstanding the requirements of this section, the state board shall have the authority to examine and inspect the voted ballots subsequent to the certification of an election.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 128, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 494, § 2; P.L. 2013, ch. 501, § 97.

17-19-40.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 318, §§ 23, 24; P.L. 1940, ch. 818, § 1; G.L. 1956, ch. 318, § 24; P.L. 1956, ch. 3755, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

17-19-45

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1996, ch. 277, § 17; P.L. 1996, ch. 298, § 17, effective January 1, 1997.

17-19-41.
Violations by public officers.

Any public officer upon whom a duty is imposed by this chapter who willfully neglects to perform that duty, or who performs it in a way as to hinder the objects of this chapter, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2195, § 21; G.L. 1938, ch. 318, § 17; P.L. 1940, ch. 818, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-19-38

; G.L. 1956, §

17-19-41

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 201, § 9.

17-19-42.
Tampering with voting equipment.

Any person, not being an election or primary officer or person upon whom a duty is imposed by this chapter, who, while any voting equipment is being made ready for an election or primary, or is in use during an election or primary, tampers with, disarranges, defaces, injures, or impairs the voting equipment in any manner, or mutilates, injures, destroys, or disarranges any computer ballot, or any other appliance used in connection with the voting equipment, shall be guilty of a felony.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2195, § 22; G.L. 1938, ch. 318, § 18; P.L. 1940, ch. 818, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, §§ 36, 39; G.L. 1956, §

17-19-39

; G.L. 1956, §

17-19-42

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 201, § 9; P.L. 1996, ch. 277, § 12; P.L. 1996, ch. 298, § 12.

17-19-43.
Tampering with sample ballot.

Every person who willfully and without lawful authority destroys, secretes, removes, defaces, alters, tampers, or meddles with a sample ballot, shall be guilty of a felony.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 318, § 18; P.L. 1952, ch. 2924, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-19-40

; G.L. 1956, §

17-19-43

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 201, § 9.

17-19-44.
Officer tampering with voting equipment.

Any person having the custody of voting equipment under this chapter, or any election or primary officer, who, with intent to cause or permit any voting equipment to fail to correctly register all votes cast, tampers with, injures, or disarranges the voting equipment in any way, or any part of the voting equipment, or who causes or consents to the voting equipment being used for voting at any election or primary with knowledge of the fact that the voting equipment is not in order or not properly set and programmed so that it will correctly register all votes cast, or who, for the purpose of defrauding or deceiving any voter or of causing it to be doubtful for what candidates or question any vote is cast, or of causing it to appear upon the voting equipment that votes cast for one candidate or question were cast for another candidate or question, removes, changes, or mutilates any computer ballot or any part of any computer ballot, or does anything to defeat the will or intention of a voter in casting a lawful vote, shall be guilty of a felony.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2195, § 19; G.L. 1938, ch. 318, § 19; P.L. 1940, ch. 818, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, §§ 36, 39; G.L. 1956, §

17-19-41

; G.L. 1956, §

17-19-44

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 201, § 9; P.L. 1996, ch. 277, § 12; P.L. 1996, ch. 298, § 12.

17-19-45.
Fraudulent election returns.

Any election or primary officer who, at the close of the polls, purposely causes the vote registered by any optical scan precinct count unit or related voting equipment to be incorrectly recorded or returned as to any candidate, person, or question, or who knowingly consents to these things, or any of them, being done, shall be guilty of a felony.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2195, § 24; G.L. 1938, ch. 318, § 20; P.L. 1940, ch. 818, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, §§ 36, 39; G.L. 1956, §

17-19-42

; G.L. 1956, §

17-19-45

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 201, § 9; P.L. 1996, ch. 277, § 12; P.L. 1996, ch. 298, § 12.

17-19-46.
False instructions as to marking a computer ballot and the operation of optical scan precinct count units.

Whoever, with intent to defraud a voter of his or her vote, or to cause a voter to lose his or her vote, gives in any way, or prints, writes, circulates, or causes to be written, printed, or circulated, any improper, false, misleading, or incorrect instructions or advice or suggestions of how to vote by computer ballot in conjunction with the optical scan precinct count unit, the following of which would cause any voter to lose his or her votes or would cause him or her to fail to register or record the votes on the optical scan precinct count unit for any candidate or question according to his or her choice, shall be guilty of a felony.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2195, § 25; G.L. 1938, ch. 318, § 21; P.L. 1940, ch. 818, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-19-43

; G.L. 1956, §

17-19-46

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 201, § 9; P.L. 1996, ch. 277, § 12; P.L. 1996, ch. 298, § 12.

17-19-47.
Improper possession of voting equipment keys or duplicates.

Any unauthorized person who makes a duplicate of, or has in his or her possession, a key to any voting equipment used at any election, or any election officer who keeps one or more keys to the voting equipment and fails or refuses to return them immediately after the election to the officer charged by law with the duty of caring for the keys, and any custodian who keeps one or more of the keys after he or she has prepared the voting equipment for election and refuses to turn the keys over to the officer charged by law with the care of the keys, and any officer charged by law with the care of the keys who keeps the keys and refuses to deliver them over to the officer’s successor in office, shall be guilty of a felony.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2195, § 26; G.L. 1938, ch. 318, § 22; P.L. 1940, ch. 818, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, §§ 36, 39; G.L. 1956, §

17-19-44

; G.L. 1956, §

17-19-47

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 201, § 9; P.L. 1996, ch. 277, § 12; P.L. 1996, ch. 298, § 12.

17-19-48.
Posting of original voter registration records.

Following the return of the certified voting lists to the local boards, each board shall cause the original registration records to reflect the appropriate voting facts from the immediately preceding election and shall also post the appropriate voting facts set forth in the list of absentee voters furnished by the state board pursuant to the requirements of chapter 22 of this title following the counting, canvassing, and tabulation of votes cast pursuant to chapter 20 of this title. The state board, by regulation, shall provide direction to local boards in the recording of voting facts and information.

History of Section.

P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 171, § 8.

17-19-49.
Political literature and influence.

No poster, paper, circular, or other document designed or tending to aid, injure, or defeat any candidate for public office or any political party on any question submitted to the voters shall be distributed or displayed within the voting place or within fifty (50) feet of the entrance or entrances to the building in which voting is conducted at any primary or election. Neither shall any election official display on his or her person within the voting place any political party button, badge, or other device tending to aid, injure, or defeat the candidacy of any person for public office or any question submitted to the voters or to intimidate or influence the voters.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 201, § 4.

17-19-50.
Candidates listing on ballot.

No candidate for any public office shall be permitted to have his or her name appear in more than one place on the ballot for the same office.

History of Section.

P.L. 1973, ch. 267, § 1.

17-19-51.
Priority for elderly voters.

At each polling place, one voting booth shall be designated for priority use by electors over sixty-five (65) years of age. These electors, once they have complied with the requirements of §

17-19-24

, shall, upon request, be permitted to vote immediately in the designated voting booth. Other voters below the age of sixty-five (65) years may use the designated voting booth when there are no voters above that age waiting to vote.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 172, § 21; P.L. 1996, ch. 277, § 12; P.L. 1996, ch. 298, § 12.

17-19-52.
Priority for disabled voters.

Whenever a voter appears at a polling place and that voter has: (1) an obvious medical disability which, in the opinion of the warden, would cause the voter to experience severe discomfort by standing in line, or (2) a certificate from a licensed physician or Christian Science practitioner attesting that the voter has a disability which makes his or her standing in line inadvisable, then that voter may be allowed a priority position for complying with requirements of §

17-19-24

and in each polling place one voting booth shall be designated for priority use by these electors. Other voters may use the voting booth when there are no disabled voters waiting to vote.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 369, § 2; P.L. 1996, ch. 277, § 12; P.L. 1996, ch. 298, § 12.

17-19-53.
Voter accompanied by children within voting booth.

Nothing contained in the general laws of Rhode Island shall prevent a voter from being accompanied by a child or children who are under the age of eighteen (18) years while the voter is within the voting booth area, provided that the child or children are under the voter’s care and supervision.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 243, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 419, § 1.

17-19-54.
Bilingual voting material requirements.

Pursuant to Section 203 of the Federal Voting Rights Act, 42 U.S.C. 1973aa-la, a city or town shall be subject to the provisions of the bilingual voting materials requirement whenever the Director of the Census determines, based on census data, that:

More than five percent (5%) of the citizens of voting age of a city or town are members of a single language minority and are limited-English proficient; or

More than ten thousand (10,000) of the citizens of voting age of a city or town are members of a single language minority and are limited-English proficient; and

The illiteracy rate of the citizens in the language minority as a group is higher than the national illiteracy rate.

Whenever a city or town subject to the provisions of subsection (a) of this section provides any registration or voting notices, forms, instructions, assistance, or other materials or information relating to the electoral process, including ballots, it shall provide them in the language of the applicable minority group as well as in the English language.

Whenever the state provides any registration or voting notices, forms, instructions, assistance, or other materials or information relating to the electoral process, including ballots, to a city or town subject to the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, it shall provide them in the language of the applicable minority group as well as in the English language.

The provisions of this section shall apply to all ballots issued or required under the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 396, § 1.